src/fst/stems/noninflecting_adjectives.lexc
LEXICON NoninflectingAdjectives

aadamaülikonnas+A:˘aadama%#ˈülikonnas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
aadeteta+A:aadeteta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
abielus+A:abi%#elus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
ahistamata+A:ahistamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
ajast-arust+A:ajast-arust GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
alasti+A:alasti GI  "weight: 7 " ; 
allahinnatud+A:˘alla%#hinnatud GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
allakirjutanud+A:˘alla%#kirjutanud GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
allakirjutatud+A:˘alla%#kirjutatud GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
allkirjata+A:˘all%#kirjata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@ammukil+A:@P.Case.Ine@ammukil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
ammuli+A:ammuli GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
apelsinikarva+A:apelsini%#k˘arva GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
apelsinivärvi+A:apelsini%#v˘ärvi GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
aravõitu+A:ara%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
arenguvõimalustega+A:arengu%#võimalustega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
argumenteerimata+A:argument˘eerimata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
armupiinas+A:armu%#piinas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
asjata+A:asʲjata GI  "weight: 8 " ; 
asustamata+A:asustamata GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
auditeerimata+A:audit˘eerimata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
aukudega+A:˘aukudega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@aukus+A:@P.Case.Ine@˘aukus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
austamisväärt+A:˘austamis%#v˘äärt GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@avakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@avakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
avali+A:avali GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
avamata+A:avamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
barokkstiilis+A:bar˘okk%#stiilis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
defektidega+A:def˘ektidega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
ebakõladega+A:eba%#kõladega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
eeltoodud+A:˘eel%#t˘oodud GI  "weight: 8 " ; 
eesmärgita+A:˘ees%#märgita GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
eevaülikonnas+A:eeva%#ˈülikonnas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@D.Stem.Guessed@eht+A:@D.Stem.Guessed@˘eht GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
eksprompt+A:eks%#pr˘ompt GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Short@ekstra+A:@P.Case.Short@˘ekstra GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@elevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@elevil GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
elukogemustega+A:elu%#kogemustega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
elukogemusteta+A:elu%#kogemusteta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
elukogenud+A:elu%#kogenud GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
ennenägemata+A:˘enne%#˘nägemata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
enneolemata+A:˘enne%#˘olemata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
eraldi+A:eraldi GI  "weight: 6 " ; 
erastamata+A:erastamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@erevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@erevil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@D.Stem.Guessed@@P.Case.Short@eri+A:@D.Stem.Guessed@@P.Case.Short@eri GI  "weight: 6 " ; 
erkvel+A:˘erkvel GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
esijoones+A:esi%#joones GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
etteaimamata+A:˘ette%#˘aimamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
ettenägemata+A:˘ette%#nägemata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
ettesirutatud+A:˘ette%#sirutatud GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
ettevalmistuseta+A:˘ette%#valʲmistuseta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
faking+A:faking GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@haarakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@haarakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
habemega+A:habemega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
haigevõitu+A:h˘aige%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
hajali+A:hajali GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@hajuvil+A:@P.Case.Ine@hajuvil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
haledavõitu+A:haleda%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
hallivõitu+A:halʲli%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
hammastega+A:hammastega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
hammasteta+A:hammasteta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@hanges+A:@P.Case.Ine@h˘anges GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@harakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@harakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
harali+A:harali GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@haravil+A:@P.Case.Ine@haravil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@harevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@harevil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
harguli+A:harguli GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
harimata+A:harimata GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@harkis+A:@P.Case.Ine@h˘arkis GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
harvavõitu+A:harva%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
hatul+A:hatul GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
heidel+A:h˘eidel GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
hiiglamoodi+A:h˘iigla%#m˘oodʲi GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
hiirekarva+A:hiire%#k˘arva GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@hinges+A:@P.Case.Ine@h˘inges GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@hinnas+A:@P.Case.Ine@hinnas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@hirmukil+A:@P.Case.Ine@hirmukil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
hooletuses+A:hooletuses GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@D.Stem.Guessed@hoos+A:@D.Stem.Guessed@h˘oos GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@hukas+A:@P.Case.Ine@hukas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
hulgaga+A:hulgaga GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
huumorimeelega+A:h˘uumori%#meelega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
huumorisoonega+A:h˘uumori%#soonega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõredavõitu+A:hõreda%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
hõõgvel+A:h˘õõgvel GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
häbiväärt+A:häbi%#v˘äärt GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@hädas+A:@P.Case.Ine@hädas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
hälvetega+A:hälvetega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
hämaravõitu+A:hämara%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@hämus+A:@P.Case.Ine@hämus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
härjaturjaga+A:härja%#turjaga GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
härmarüüs+A:härma%#r˘üüs GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@härmas+A:@P.Case.Ine@h˘ärmas GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
hääleõigusega+A:hääle%#˘õigusega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
ideaalideta+A:ide˘aalideta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
igavavõitu+A:igava%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
ihnevõitu+A:˘ihne%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
ihukarva+A:ihu%#k˘arva GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
ihuvärvi+A:ihu%#v˘ärvi GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
ilmajäänud+A:ilma%#jäänud GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
imekspanemisväärt+A:imeks%#panemis%#v˘äärt GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
individuaalsuseta+A:individu˘aalsuseta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
innal+A:innal GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@irevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@irevil GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
irruli+A:irruli GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@irvakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@irvakil GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
@D.Stem.Guessed@@P.Case.Short@ise+A:@D.Stem.Guessed@@P.Case.Short@ise GI  "weight: 3 " ; 
iseloomuta+A:ise%#loomuta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
iseteenindusega+A:ise%#teenindusega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
isevärki+A:ise%#v˘ärki GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
isikuta+A:isikuta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
isikuteta+A:isikuteta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@itsikil+A:@P.Case.Ine@itʲsikil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
jahedavõitu+A:jaheda%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@D.Stem.Guessed@jokk+A:@D.Stem.Guessed@j˘okk GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@jokkis+A:@P.Case.Ine@j˘okkis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@jommis+A:@P.Case.Ine@j˘ommis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@joobes+A:@P.Case.Ine@j˘oobes GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@jooksus+A:@P.Case.Ine@jooksus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
joontega+A:joontega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
juurteta+A:juurteta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@jõllis+A:@P.Case.Ine@j˘õlʲlis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
jõnksudega+A:j˘õnksudega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@jõrris+A:@P.Case.Ine@j˘õrris GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
järelejätmata+A:järele%#j˘ätmata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
järelevalvenõukogu+A:järele%#v˘alve%#n˘õu%#kogu GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
jääkammitsas+A:j˘ää%#kammitsas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@D.Stem.Guessed@jääs+A:@D.Stem.Guessed@j˘ääs GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
jäävangis+A:j˘ää%#vangis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kaalumata+A:k˘aalumata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kaardus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘aardus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kaarnakarva+A:k˘aarna%#k˘arva GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kaelani+A:kaelani GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kahjustamata+A:kahjustamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kahkvel+A:k˘ahkvel GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kahlus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘ahlus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kahukil+A:@P.Case.Ine@kahukil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kahus+A:@P.Case.Ine@kahus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kaisus+A:@P.Case.Ine@kaisus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kaitseta+A:k˘aitseta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kaitsmata+A:k˘aitsmata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kalkvel+A:k˘alkvel GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kallakil+A:@P.Case.Ine@kallakil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kaltsus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘altsus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kammitsas+A:kammitsas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kampas+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘ampas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kantis+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘anʲtis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@karpas+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘arpas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
karva+A:k˘arva GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
karvadeta+A:k˘arvadeta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
karvasjalg+A:karvas%#j˘alg GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kasimata+A:kasimata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kasutamata+A:kasutamata GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
kasvu+A:k˘asvu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kasvuvõimalustega+A:kasvu%#võimalustega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
katmata+A:k˘atmata GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
kaugõppes+A:k˘aug%#˘õppes GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kavaldamata+A:kavaldamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kavaluseta+A:kavaluseta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
keerdudega+A:k˘eerdudega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@keerdus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘eerdus GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
keerukuseta+A:keerukuseta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
keerutamata+A:keerutamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kehevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@kehevil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kehkvel+A:k˘ehkvel GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kehvavõitu+A:kehva%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kenus+A:@P.Case.Ine@kenus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@keras+A:@P.Case.Ine@keras GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kerkvel+A:k˘erkvel GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kiduravõitu+A:kidura%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kihevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@kihevil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kihkvel+A:k˘ihkvel GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kiikvel+A:k˘iikvel GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kiimal+A:kiimal GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kiirustamata+A:kiirustamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kiivas+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘iivas GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kikkis+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘ikkis GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
kimbatuses+A:kimbatuses GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kipras+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘ipras GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
kirgedeta+A:k˘irgedeta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kirja+A:k˘irja GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kirjutamata+A:kirjutamata GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kirtsus+A:@P.Case.Ine@kirtsus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kiskudega+A:k˘iskudega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kissis+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘isʲsis GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
kitsavõitu+A:k˘itsa%#v˘õitu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kitsikuses+A:kitʲsikuses GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@klimpis+A:@P.Case.Ine@kl˘impis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kodustamata+A:kodustamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
koduta+A:koduta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kogemusteta+A:kogemusteta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@D.Stem.Guessed@kogu+A:@D.Stem.Guessed@kogu GI  "weight: 4 " ; 
kogupere+A:kogu%#pere GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kohevil+A:@P.Case.Ine@kohevil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kohkvel+A:k˘ohkvel GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kohmas+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘ohmas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kohvikarva+A:kohvi%#k˘arva GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kokkumonteerimata+A:k˘okku%#mont˘eerimata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kongis+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘ongis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kongus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘ongus GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@konksus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘onksus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kontrollimata+A:kontr˘olʲlimata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kontsentreerimata+A:kontsentr˘eerimata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@konukil+A:@P.Case.Ine@konukil GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kookus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘ookus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kooldus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘ooldus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
koolitamata+A:koolʲitamata GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
koolnukarva+A:k˘oolnu%#k˘arva GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
koostöönõukogu+A:k˘oos%#t˘öö%#n˘õu%#kogu GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
koristamata+A:koristamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@korpas+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘orpas GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
korraldamata+A:korraldamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@korras+A:@P.Case.Ine@korras GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
korrastamata+A:korrastamata GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kortsudeta+A:k˘ortsudeta GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kortsus+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘ortsus GI  "weight: 9 " ; 
kotkapilguga+A:k˘otka%#pilguga GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
kotkatiibadega+A:k˘otka%#t˘iibadega GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kottis+A:@P.Case.Ine@k˘otʲtis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@krampis+A:@P.Case.Ine@kr˘ampis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kriimus+A:@P.Case.Ine@kr˘iimus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@krillis+A:@P.Case.Ine@kr˘ilʲlis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@krimpsus+A:@P.Case.Ine@kr˘impsus GI  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@kronksus+A:@P.Case.Ine@kr˘onksus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@krussis+A:@P.Case.Ine@kr˘usʲsis GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@krõnksus+A:@P.Case.Ine@kr˘õnksus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Case.Ine@krässus+A:@P.Case.Ine@kr˘ässus GI  "weight: 11 " ; 
